Illinois, session 104th, SB2592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $226,026,400, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 8University to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal 9year ending June 30, 2026. 10    Section 10. The sum of $62,800, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 12the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois University for any 13costs associated with the Daily Egyptian Newspaper. 14    Section 15. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois University 17for costs associated with the National Corn-to-Ethanol 18Research Center and ethanol research grants. 19    Section 20. The sum of $1,130,600, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education   SB2592- 2 -OMB104 00138 LAP 10138 b1Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 2University for all costs associated with the Simmons Cancer 3Institute. 4    Section 25. The sum of $16,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the State College and 6University Trust Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern 7Illinois University for scholarship grant awards. 8    Section 30. The sum of $1,250,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Professions 10Dedicated Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 11University for all costs associated with the development, 12support or administration of pharmacy practice education or 13training programs at the Edwardsville campus. 14    Section 35. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois University 17for all costs associated with programming at the formerly 18Lindenwood Campus in Belleville. 19    Section 40. The sum of $266,600, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 21the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois University for 22costs associated with the SIU Office of Community Engagement.   SB2592- 3 -OMB104 00138 LAP 10138 b1    Section 45. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 3the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois University for the 4SIU Institute of Rural Health. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.